Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-9,118
Participation in retirement system; qualification.

No employee shall be authorized to participate in the retirement system unless the employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United States. The employing public school and the school employee shall:

(1) Maintain at least one approved identification document as defined in section 4-108; and

(2) Produce any such approved identification document so maintained upon request of the Public Employees Retirement Board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems.

Laws 2011, LB509, § 37;

Laws 2024, LB198, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB295, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 35.
July 18, 2026